Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB671.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Plain Language Oil and Gas Real Property Contract Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Contract." A written agreement between a landowner and an oil and gas land broker, landman, oil company or gas company for the sale, transfer, conveyance or lease of real property."Landowner." An individual or group of individuals with interest in real property or named on the deed or title of the real property.Section 3. Test of readability.123456789101112131415161718 (a) Requirements.--A contract shall be written, organized and designed so that the contract is easy to read and understand.(b) Language guidelines.--In determining whether a contract meets the requirements of subsection (a), a court shall consider the following language guidelines:(1) The contract should use short words, sentences and paragraphs.(2) The contract should use active verbs.(3) The contract should not use technical legal terms other than commonly understood legal terms.(4) The contract should not use Latin and foreign words or any other word when its use requires reliance upon an obsolete meaning.(5) The contract must define industry-specific terms whose definitions have meanings which are not commonly understood.(6) The definitions of words defined in the contract should be defined by using commonly understood meanings.(7) When the contract refers to the parties to the contract, the references should use personal pronouns, the actual or shortened names of the parties, the terms "seller" and "buyer" or the terms "lessor" and "lessee."(8) The contract should not use sentences that contain more than one condition.(9) The contract should not use cross references, except cross references that briefly and clearly describe the substances of the item to which the reference is made.(10) The contract should not use sentences with double negatives or exceptions to exceptions.20250HB0671PN0678 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Visual guidelines.--In determining whether a contract meets the requirements of subsection (a), a court shall consider the following guidelines:(1) The contract should have type size, line length, column width, margins and spacing between lines and paragraphs that make the contract easy to read.(2) The contract should caption sections in boldface type.(3) The contract should use ink that contrasts sharply with the paper.Section 4. Notarization of contracts.(a) Execution.--A contract shall be signed by the landowner in the presence of a notary public in this Commonwealth.(b) Receipt of contract.--The landowner and buyer or lessee shall receive a notarized copy of the contract.Section 5. Damages and enforcement.(a) Damages and other remedies.--An oil and gas land broker, landman, oil company or gas company that executes a contract with a landowner that does not comply with the test of readability provided under section 3 is liable to the landowner for all of the following:(1) Compensation in an amount equal to the value of any actual loss caused by the violation of this act.(2) Statutory damages of $10,000.(3) Court costs.(4) Reasonable attorney fees.(5) Any equitable and other relief ordered by the court.(b) Enforcement.--A violation of this act is deemed to be a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.20250HB0671PN0678 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6. Limitations on liability.(a) Limitation generally.--There shall be no liability under section 5 if any of the following occur:(1) The landowner wrote the contract or part of the contract that violates this act.(2) The oil and gas land broker, landman, oil company or gas company made a good faith and reasonable effort to comply with this act.(b) Time limit to file lawsuit.--A lawsuit under this act must be filed within 10 years from the date on which the contract was executed.Section 7. Applicability.This act shall apply to the following:(1) All contracts that are executed, solicited or intended to be performed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) A renewal, extension, option or change in the terms of an existing contract on or after the effective date of this section.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0671PN0678 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021